Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,206
Release, defined.

Release means to spill, leak, pump, pour, emit, empty, discharge, inject, escape, leach, dump, or dispose any hazardous chemical, extremely hazardous substance, or toxic chemical into the environment and includes the abandonment or discarding of barrels, containers, and other closed receptacles containing any such chemical or substance.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 16.